Massachusetts, session 194th, S465.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The executive office of elder affairs, under authority granted in section 4 of 
chapter 19A of Massachusetts general laws, shall amend the Massachusetts home care 
regulations (651 CMR 3.00).  Such amendment shall require home care program services be 
made available to persons diagnosed with amyotrophic lateral sclerosis regardless of their age, if 
they are otherwise eligible for such services. The secretary for health and human services shall 
ensure that the relevant agencies under her purview promulgate regulations as necessary to 
implement this act. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 118E: DIVISION OF MEDICAL ASSISTANCE of the 
Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is hereby amended by 
adding the following section: 
Section 79: Patient-Centeredness 

of 4 12  Section 79 (a) Standards for Patient-Centeredness in Research & Analysis. The Division 
of Medical Assistance shall ensure that any portfolio of research and analysis relied upon for 
decision-making, whether provided by a state agency or a third party, impacting enrollee access 
to healthcare treatments and services, meets standards of patient-centeredness. The Division of 
Medical Assistance shall publicly provide a summary of patient-centeredness standards for any 
such analysis that includes, but is not limited to: 
1) Evaluation of a range of research and analysis that includes outcomes prioritized by 
patients and people with disabilities within a specific disease area. If necessary, the Division of 
Medical Assistance will commission a survey of patients to identify relevant outcomes within a 
disease area. 
2) Evaluation of a range of research and analysis that looks at relevant patient subgroups 
to ensure consideration of important differences in preferences and clinical characteristics within 
patient subpopulations. 
3) Scientific Rigor: The Division of Medical Assistance shall require research and 
analysis to comply with good research practices, defined as consideration of the full range of 
relevant, peer-reviewed evidence (e.g., real-world evidence, research from range of sponsors 
including manufacturers), avoid patient harm through over-interpretation of findings of 
“inconclusive” evidence of clinical differences and instead allow time for conduct of additional 
research. 
(b) Prohibition on Reliance on Discriminatory Measures. The Division of Medical 
Assistance shall not develop or utilize, directly or indirectly through a contracted entity or other 
third-party, a dollars-per-quality adjusted life year or any similar measures or research in 

of 4 34 determining whether a particular health care treatment is cost effective, recommended, the value 
of a treatment, or in determining coverage, reimbursement, appropriate payment amounts, cost-
sharing, or incentive policies or programs. 
(c) Appeals and Physician Override Mechanisms. The Division of Medical Assistance 
may not implement any policy limiting patient access to healthcare treatment and services which 
does not contain an appeals or physician override mechanism. Physicians may not be 
discriminated against or otherwise negatively impacted for utilizing available physician override 
mechanisms. 
SECTION 3. Chapter 6D of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, 
is hereby amended by adding the following section: 
Section 20. Patient-Centeredness Standards for Health Policy Commission Reviews 
Section 20 (a) Standards for Patient-Centeredness in Research & Analysis. The Health 
Policy Commission shall ensure that any portfolio of research and analysis relied upon for 
determining the value of a healthcare treatment or service , whether provided by a state agency 
or a third party, impacting enrollee access to healthcare treatments and services, meets standards 
of patient-centeredness. The Health Policy Commission shall publicly provide a summary of 
patient-centeredness standards for any such analysis that includes, but is not limited to: 
1) Evaluation of a range of research and analysis that includes outcomes prioritized by 
patients and people with disabilities within a specific disease area. If necessary, the Health Policy 
Commission will commission a survey of patients to identify relevant outcomes within a disease 
area. 

of 4 55  2) Evaluation of a range of research and analysis that looks at relevant patient subgroups 
to ensure consideration of important differences in preferences and clinical characteristics within 
patient subpopulations. 
3) Scientific Rigor: The Health Policy Commission shall require research and analysis to 
comply with good research practices, defined as consideration of the full range of relevant, peer-
reviewed evidence (e.g., real-world evidence, research from range of sponsors including 
manufacturers), avoid patient harm through over-interpretation of findings of “inconclusive” 
evidence of clinical differences and instead allow time for conduct of additional research. 
(b) Prohibition on Reliance on Discriminatory Measures. The Health Policy Commission 
shall not develop or utilize, directly or indirectly through a contracted entity or other third-party, 
a dollars-per-quality adjusted life year or any similar measures or research in determining 
whether a particular health care treatment is cost effective, recommended, the value of a 
treatment, or in determining coverage, reimbursement, appropriate payment amounts, cost-
sharing, or incentive policies or programs.